Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB238.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1506.1. Application for REAL ID.(a) Verification of Social Security number.--The department shall accept a Social Security card, W-2 form, SSA 1099 form, a non-SSA 1099 form or a pay stub that fulfills the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005 (Public Law 109-113, 119 Stat. 302) for the purpose of reviewing an application for a REAL ID and verifying the applicant's Social Security number.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "REAL ID" means a photo identification card or driver's license issued by the department under this chapter or Chapter 16 (relating to commercial drivers) that complies with the REAL ID Act of 2005.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0238PN0190 - 2 - 1